npfl094/hw-two-level-morphology/german-lexicon.lexc
!!! german-lexicon.lexc !!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +V +A +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl +Nom +Acc +Dat +Gen +Comp Sup+ +Pred +Att Uml+ @P.UML.ON@ @R.UML@ @D.UML@ @C.UML@ @P.SUP.ON@ @R.SUP@ @D.SUP@ @C.SUP@ @N.SUP@

LEXICON Root

Adjective ;
AdjectiveSup ;
Noun ;

LEXICON AdjectiveSup

@P.SUP.ON@Sup+:@P.SUP.ON@am_ Adjective;

LEXICON AdjDeg

@R.SUP@+Pred:@R.SUP@^sten	#;
@R.SUP@+Att:@R.SUP@^st		AdjArt;
@D.SUP@+Comp:@D.SUP@^er		AdjArt;
AdjArt;

LEXICON AdjArt

+Def:0	AdjSoft;
+Indef:0	AdjIndef;
AdjHard;

LEXICON AdjSoft

+A+Nom+M:^e		#;
+A+Nom+F:^e		#;
+A+Nom+N:^e		#;
+A+Nom+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Acc+M:^en	#;
+A+Acc+F:^e		#;
+A+Acc+N:^e		#;
+A+Acc+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Dat+M:^en	#;
+A+Dat+F:^en	#;
+A+Dat+N:^en	#;
+A+Dat+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Gen+M:^en	#;
+A+Gen+F:^en	#;
+A+Gen+N:^en	#;
+A+Gen+Pl:^en	#;

LEXICON AdjIndef

+A+Nom+M:^er	#;
+A+Nom+F:^e		#;
+A+Nom+N:^es	#;
+A+Nom+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Acc+M:^en	#;
+A+Acc+F:^e		#;
+A+Acc+N:^es	#;
+A+Acc+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Dat+M:^en	#;
+A+Dat+F:^en	#;
+A+Dat+N:^en	#;
+A+Dat+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Gen+M:^en	#;
+A+Gen+F:^en	#;
+A+Gen+N:^en	#;
+A+Gen+Pl:^en	#;

LEXICON AdjHard

+A+Nom+M:^er	#;
+A+Nom+F:^e		#;
+A+Nom+N:^es	#;
+A+Nom+Pl:^e	#;

+A+Acc+M:^en	#;
+A+Acc+F:^e		#;
+A+Acc+N:^es	#;
+A+Acc+Pl:^e	#;

+A+Dat+M:^em	#;
+A+Dat+F:^er	#;
+A+Dat+N:^em	#;
+A+Dat+Pl:^en	#;

+A+Gen+M:^en	#;
+A+Gen+F:^er	#;
+A+Gen+N:^en	#;
+A+Gen+Pl:^er	#;

LEXICON NMW

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^en	#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^en	#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^en	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^en	#;

LEXICON NMno

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^	#;

LEXICON NMe

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^e	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^e	#;

LEXICON NMs

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^s	#;

LEXICON NFn

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^		#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^en	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^en	#;

LEXICON NFs

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^		#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^s	#;

LEXICON NNno

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^	#;

LEXICON NNer

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

@D.UML@+N+Pl+Nom:@D.UML@^er		#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Acc:@D.UML@^er		#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Dat:@D.UML@^er^n	#;
@D.UML@+N+Pl+Gen:@D.UML@^er		#;

LEXICON NNs

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^s	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^s	#;

LEXICON NNse

+N+Sg+Nom:0		#;
+N+Sg+Acc:^		#;
+N+Sg+Dat:^		#;
+N+Sg+Gen:^ses	#;

+N+Pl+Nom:^se	#;
+N+Pl+Acc:^se	#;
+N+Pl+Dat:^se	#;
+N+Pl+Gen:^se	#;

LEXICON Adjective
ernüchternd	AdjDeg;
stereotyp	AdjDeg;
hergeholt	AdjDeg;
überzogen	AdjDeg;
lebenswert	AdjDeg;
eigentumsrechtlich	AdjDeg;
ungesichert	AdjDeg;
uneingeschränkt	AdjDeg;
geschwächt	AdjDeg;
expressiv	AdjDeg;
stündlich	AdjDeg;
erhältlich	AdjDeg;
deutschlandweit	AdjDeg;
schlaflos	AdjDeg;
unbrauchbar	AdjDeg;
beeindruckt	AdjDeg;
gemein	AdjDeg;
anhaltend	AdjDeg;
überwältigend	AdjDeg;
sinnreich	AdjDeg;
schmerzhaft	AdjDeg;
überschuldet	AdjDeg;
verhaltensauffällig	AdjDeg;
getürkt	AdjDeg;
irreal	AdjDeg;
lesenswert	AdjDeg;
ungelöst	AdjDeg;
ehrenvoll	AdjDeg;
meldepflichtig	AdjDeg;
satzungsrechtlich	AdjDeg;
kostenlos	AdjDeg;
mechanisch	AdjDeg;
weltoffen	AdjDeg;
förmlich	AdjDeg;
gleichbedeutend	AdjDeg;
minderheitlich	AdjDeg;
behaust	AdjDeg;
gezielt	AdjDeg;
allzufrüh	AdjDeg;
attraktiv	AdjDeg;
grotesk	AdjDeg;
LEXICON Noun
Spitzenkanddiat	NMW;
Vorsitzende	NMW;
Fleischfabrikant	NMW;
Fernsehapparat	NMW;
Fernsehintendant	NMW;
Extremist	NMW;
Fünfte	NMW;
Tiefsinnigste	NMW;
Galerist	NMW;
Stadtstaat	NMW;
Lohnsklave	NMW;
Abgeordnete	NMW;
Beste	NMW;
Demokrat	NMW;
Finanzmagnat	NMW;
Geselle	NMW;
Entlassene	NMW;
Provinzpräsident	NMW;
Sekundant	NMW;
Unschuldigste	NMW;
Däne	NMW;
Literaturpreise	NMW;
Tee	NMW;
Neurobiologe	NMW;
Rationalist	NMW;
Reiseriese	NMW;
Halbleitergigant	NMW;
Architekturpublizist	NMW;
Flüchtlinge	NMW;
Wirtschaftsexperte	NMW;
Einheitsgedanke	NMW;
Gitarrist	NMW;
Naturschutzreferent	NMW;
Genosse	NMW;
Konsument	NMW;
Bürgerstaat	NMW;
Gegenkandidat	NMW;
Mitgliedsstaat	NMW;
Moraltheologe	NMW;
Verbandspräsident	NMW;
Bundesstaat	NMW;
Grundwasserspiegel	NMno;
Stilwandel	NMno;
Durchschnittsbürger	NMno;
Marktteilnehmer	NMno;
Kollegen	NMno;
Durchmesser	NMno;
Vorsitzender	NMno;
Graupäßler	NMno;
Grüngürtel	NMno;
Galeristen	NMno;
Silberspiegel	NMno;
Eimer	NMno;
Iraker	NMno;
Lüfter	NMno;
Fernsprechriesen	NMno;
Terroristen	NMno;
Ausflugsdampfer	NMno;
Lastwagen	NMno;
Zweifel	NMno;
Regierungswechsel	NMno;
Religionsartikel	NMno;
Bundespräsidenten	NMno;
Hammer	NMno;
Fünfakter	NMno;
Kardinalfehler	NMno;
Schmöker	NMno;
Zeitungsverkäufer	NMno;
Staatsrechtler	NMno;
Planeten	NMno;
Trachtenjanker	NMno;
Mietwagen	NMno;
Gesellschafter	NMno;
Notenbanker	NMno;
Hardliner	NMno;
Inhaber	NMno;
Gestaltungswillen	NMno;
Beauftragten	NMno;
Bittsteller	NMno;
Mittelalterdichter	NMno;
Wohnungseigentümer	NMno;
Literaturkritiker	NMno;
Grandseigneur	NMe;
Lohnausgleich	NMe;
Minderheitspremier	NMe;
Äthiopier	NMe;
Reserveoffizier	NMe;
Filmregisseur	NMe;
Geschäftsbereich	NMe;
Zuluhäuptling	NMe;
Teich	NMe;
Polizeioffizier	NMe;
Kommandeur	NMe;
Preisvergleich	NMe;
Finanzjongleur	NMe;
Australier	NMe;
Vorstandsbereich	NMe;
Hotelier	NMe;
Georgier	NMe;
Freier	NMe;
Fremdling	NMe;
Teppich	NMe;
Zahlungsausgleich	NMe;
Transporteur	NMe;
Flüchtling	NMe;
Staatsstreich	NMe;
Transitbereich	NMe;
Steuerinspekteur	NMe;
Zuständigkeitsbereich	NMe;
Vizepremier	NMe;
Jahresvergleich	NMe;
Narrenkönig	NMe;
Importeur	NMe;
Industriezweig	NMe;
Dreier	NMe;
Generalinspekteur	NMe;
Finanzausgleich	NMe;
Eindringling	NMe;
Kostenvergleich	NMe;
Kompetenzbereich	NMe;
Milliardenbereich	NMe;
Romancier	NMe;
Generalgouverneur	NMe;
Traditionalismu	NMs;
Postkommunismu	NMs;
Kaugummi	NMs;
Impressionismu	NMs;
Debattenprofi	NMs;
Organismu	NMs;
Terrorismu	NMs;
Sherpa	NMs;
Chemiemulti	NMs;
Tornado	NMs;
Aktivsaldo	NMs;
Juli	NMs;
Merkantilismu	NMs;
Anno	NMs;
Po	NMs;
Israeli	NMs;
Existentialismu	NMs;
Multi	NMs;
Zirku	NMs;
Libero	NMs;
Ski	NMs;
Welttourismu	NMs;
Rassismu	NMs;
Linksradikalismu	NMs;
Antisemitismu	NMs;
Ölmulti	NMs;
Parteienpluralismu	NMs;
Tourismu	NMs;
Kollektivismu	NMs;
Papa	NMs;
Verkaufsprofi	NMs;
Sozialismu	NMs;
Totalitarismu	NMs;
Euro	NMs;
Optimismu	NMs;
Ayatholla	NMs;
Profi	NMs;
Buddhismu	NMs;
Flamingo	NMs;
Globu	NMs;
Lama	NMs;
Rikscha	NFs;
Anlagefirma	NFs;
Tu	NFs;
Kobra	NFs;
Delta	NFs;
Hauptfirma	NFs;
Fauna	NFs;
Gutachterfirma	NFs;
Kickerlobby	NFs;
Jury	NFs;
Prostata	NFs;
Ballerina	NFs;
Erfolgsstory	NFs;
Kamera	NFs;
Lira	NFs;
Regionalliga	NFs;
Liga	NFs;
Morgana	NFs;
Familienfirma	NFs;
Wäschefirma	NFs;
Mama	NFs;
Investmentfirma	NFs;
Demo	NFs;
Ferienfirma	NFs;
Sportarena	NFs;
Militärjunta	NFs;
Arena	NFs;
Telefonfirma	NFs;
Generikafirma	NFs;
Story	NFs;
Sauna	NFs;
Stromfirma	NFs;
Beratungsfirma	NFs;
Patina	NFs;
Lobby	NFs;
Party	NFs;
Staatsduma	NFs;
Geldwechselfirma	NFs;
Teilkasko	NFs;
Vita	NFs;
Alterspatina	NFs;
Berufung	NFn;
Klangwirkung	NFn;
Neugründung	NFn;
Alpenregion	NFn;
Collage	NFn;
Delegierte	NFn;
Sparkassenfusion	NFn;
Parteivize	NFn;
Pflichtlektüre	NFn;
Treppe	NFn;
Vorbemerkung	NFn;
Ostasienreise	NFn;
Jahrestagung	NFn;
Unterbringung	NFn;
Sorge	NFn;
Urheberschaft	NFn;
Scheiße	NFn;
Wunschmaschine	NFn;
Industrie	NFn;
Region	NFn;
Installation	NFn;
Metaphysik	NFn;
Identifikation	NFn;
Metallgesellschaft	NFn;
Altersversorgung	NFn;
Parteiführung	NFn;
Achtung	NFn;
Organisationsmaßnahme	NFn;
Beitragsschraube	NFn;
Ertragssteigerung	NFn;
Variante	NFn;
Darstellungsweise	NFn;
Volksbefreiungsarmee	NFn;
Kräftenachfrage	NFn;
Lächerlichkeit	NFn;
Rechtsordnung	NFn;
Verfassungsrechtsprechung	NFn;
Polizeipatrouille	NFn;
Fangprämie	NFn;
These	NFn;
Heiterkeit	NFn;
Fischen	NNno;
Auftauchen	NNno;
Pipimachen	NNno;
Verständlichen	NNno;
Wiedersehen	NNno;
Herzen	NNno;
Weihwasser	NNno;
Gedenken	NNno;
Pokerspiel	NNno;
Lichtermeer	NNno;
Strahlen	NNno;
Muster	NNno;
Wirtschaftswunder	NNno;
Draufhauen	NNno;
Konsolidierungsziel	NNno;
Reisemittel	NNno;
Freizeitgeschehen	NNno;
Verhalten	NNno;
Wirtschaftspapier	NNno;
Weihnachten	NNno;
Konzentrationslager	NNno;
Strohfeuer	NNno;
Label	NNno;
Auseinanderfallen	NNno;
Arbeitgeberlager	NNno;
Gutachten	NNno;
Schattenboxen	NNno;
Buschmesser	NNno;
Lockmittel	NNno;
Beschweigen	NNno;
Veterinärwesen	NNno;
Klagen	NNno;
Lustspiel	NNno;
Schwanken	NNno;
Beantragen	NNno;
Warten	NNno;
Freien	NNno;
Gewissen	NNno;
Großunternehmen	NNno;
Freizeitunternehmen	NNno;
Verlassen	NNno;
Reservoir	NNer;
Entwicklungsland	NNer;
Erlebniskurzreise	NNer;
Polizeipräsidium	NNer;
Abfackeln	NNer;
Nachtgeschäft	NNer;
Amte	NNer;
Imperium	NNer;
Requiem	NNer;
Bürgerschaftsgesetz	NNer;
Sicherheitsprotokoll	NNer;
Jahrhundert	NNer;
Amnestiegesetz	NNer;
Kreuz	NNer;
Kleinformat	NNer;
Unbekanntes	NNer;
Querulantentum	NNer;
Staatsparlament	NNer;
Berufsverbot	NNer;
Schlüsselprojekt	NNer;
Postministerium	NNer;
Jagdflugzeug	NNer;
Hof	NNer;
Formular	NNer;
Geschäft	NNer;
Kinderhilfswerk	NNer;
Male	NNer;
Kommissionssekretariat	NNer;
Staatsratsgebäude	NNer;
Bürgerkriegsgebiet	NNer;
Futterwerk	NNer;
Antragsbuch	NNer;
Menschenrechte	NNer;
Repertoire	NNer;
Statut	NNer;
Seelenstriptease	NNer;
Leineschloß	NNer;
Telekommunikationsgesetz	NNer;
Lebendgewicht	NNer;
Schlimmeres	NNer;
Koma	NNs;
Co	NNs;
Libretto	NNs;
Kommando	NNs;
Wahlbüro	NNs;
Kali	NNs;
Halma	NNs;
Tempo	NNs;
Konsumklima	NNs;
Beschäftigungsthema	NNs;
Verkehrsbüro	NNs;
Generalkommando	NNs;
Gummi	NNs;
Ministerbüro	NNs;
Hobby	NNs;
Girokonto	NNs;
Kni	NNs;
Charisma	NNs;
Herzinfarktrisiko	NNs;
Schema	NNs;
Deklassierungsrisiko	NNs;
Selbstmordkommando	NNs;
Büro	NNs;
Kleinauto	NNs;
Architekturbüro	NNs;
Verkehrsklima	NNs;
Nationalauto	NNs;
Dreiliterauto	NNs;
Photo	NNs;
Taxi	NNs;
Tremolo	NNs;
Ja	NNs;
Intermezzo	NNs;
Risiko	NNs;
Vorjahresniveau	NNs;
Dachbodenstudio	NNs;
Blau	NNs;
Freitagsniveau	NNs;
Milieu	NNs;
Kostenniveau	NNs;
Studio	NNs;
Vermächtnis	NNse;
Reformbündnis	NNse;
Teilgeständnis	NNse;
Einkaufserlebnis	NNse;
Fehlverständnis	NNse;
Bedürfnis	NNse;
Untersuchungsgefängnis	NNse;
Gefängnis	NNse;
Begräbnis	NNse;
Zerwürfnis	NNse;
Gedächtnis	NNse;
Mißverhältnis	NNse;
Treueverhältnis	NNse;
Verhängnis	NNse;
Geheimnis	NNse;
Erfolgsgeheimnis	NNse;
Konzernbetriebsergebnis	NNse;
Geschäftsergebnis	NNse;
Staatsgeheimnis	NNse;
Höhlengleichnis	NNse;
Verhandlungsergebnis	NNse;
Bildnis	NNse;
Steuergeheimnis	NNse;
Megaereignis	NNse;
Haupthindernis	NNse;
Arbeitsverhältnis	NNse;
Gesprächsergebnis	NNse;
Abschiebehindernis	NNse;
Bekenntnis	NNse;
Kriegsbündnis	NNse;
Schuldbekenntnis	NNse;
Wahlbündnis	NNse;
Verständnis	NNse;
Endergebnis	NNse;
Rekordergebnis	NNse;
Dreiecksverhältnis	NNse;
Spitzentennis	NNse;
Zahlenverhältnis	NNse;
Parteienbündnis	NNse;
Reifezeugnis	NNse;
